California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 hospital receive additional supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amounts in excess of the difference between the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital and the amount computed for the hospital under subparagraph (A). Any additional supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount, or portion thereof, that otherwise would have been payable under this paragraph to a hospital, but that is barred by this limitation, shall be distributed on a descending pro rata basis to those hospitals eligible for distributions under this subdivision that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation.

(4) The department shall make interim and final payments of the additional supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments to hospitals on or before August 15, 1998.

(5) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal
 State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(ag) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the payment adjustment program for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year shall be structured as set forth below and in subdivision (ah).

(1) (A) The department shall compute the projected total payment adjustment amounts for all eligible hospitals for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year by determining for each eligible hospital its total per diem composite amount and multiplying that figure by the maximum number of the hospital’s Medi-Cal inpatient paid days determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (l). For purposes of this subparagraph, these determinations shall be without regard to the OBRA 1993 payment limitations. With respect to a public hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, is part
 of a county-operated health system of three or more eligible hospitals licensed to the county, the projected total payment adjustment amount shall be reduced by an amount equal to the amount paid or payable to the hospital under subdivision (af).

(B) The computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for each hospital shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital.

(C) Where the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under subparagraph (A) shall be reduced to an amount equal to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the particular hospital. The amount so reduced shall be used for purposes of subparagraph (E). Except, however, with
 respect to a public hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, is part of a county-operated health system of three or more eligible hospitals licensed to the county, the amount as so reduced shall be increased by an amount equal to the amount paid or payable to the hospital under subdivision (af), and used for purposes of subparagraph (E).

(D) Where the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital is equal to or less than the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) shall be used for purposes of subparagraph (E). Except, however, with respect to a public hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, is part of a county-operated health system of three or more eligible hospitals licensed to the county, the computed amount shall be increased by an amount equal to the amount paid or payable to the hospital under subdivision (af), and used for purposes of subparagraph (E).

(E) The amounts determined under subparagraphs (C) and (D) for all eligible hospitals shall be added together, yielding an aggregate sum. The aggregate sum shall be the unadjusted projected total payment adjustment program for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year, exclusive of any supplemental payment adjustments under subdivision (ah).

(2) The initial maximum size of the payment adjustment program for the 1998–99 payment adjustment program shall be set at one billion seven hundred fifty million dollars ($1,750,000,000), exclusive of any supplemental payment adjustments under subdivision (ah).

(3) (A) The department shall increase or decrease the amount determined for each eligible hospital under subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (1), as applicable, by multiplying the amount by an identical
 percentage, yielding the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year. The identical percentage figure to be used for this purpose shall be that percentage that is derived by dividing the amount set forth in paragraph (2) by the aggregate sum determined under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1). Except, however, the amount determined for a hospital under subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (1), as applicable, shall not be increased so that it would exceed the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, and, where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall be reallocated to all other hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata basis so that the aggregate sum of the tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts for all hospitals equals the amount set forth in paragraph (2).

(B) (i) With respect to a public hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, is part of a county-operated health system of three or more eligible hospitals licensed to the county, the amount determined under subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (1), as applicable, shall be reduced by an amount equal to the amount paid or payable to the hospital under subdivision (af), prior to applying the OBRA 1993 payment limitation under subparagraph (A).

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), all other computations under subparagraph (A), including the determination of the hospital’s pro rata share of any reallocations, shall be made as though the reduction described in clause (i) had not occurred.

(4) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount computed for each eligible hospital under paragraph (3) shall
 be further adjusted as follows:

(A) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a nonpublic-converted hospital as of July 1, 1998, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “nonpublic-converted hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be that which is necessary to result for each such hospital in an amount equal to the amount used for the particular hospital under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5).

(B) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the
 definition of a converted hospital as of July 1, 1998, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “converted hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be that which is necessary to result for each such hospital in an amount equal to: (I) the maximum number of the hospital’s annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (l); multiplied by (II) the total per diem composite amount determined for the hospital, the calculation of the per diem composite amount being restricted by a maximum low-income number of 40 percent for the hospital, regardless if the hospital’s low-income number would otherwise be higher. In no case shall the product of this calculation exceed the amount used for the particular hospital under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total
 payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5).

(C) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a nonpublic hospital as of July 1, 1998, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “nonpublic hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be derived as follows:

(I) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts determined under paragraph (3) for each nonpublic hospital described above shall be added together.

(II) The amount identified in paragraph (2) shall be divided by 2.347. The resulting figure shall then be reduced by the sum of the amounts determined for all
 nonpublic-converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) and the amounts determined for all converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (B).

(III) The amount computed under subclause (II) shall be divided by 2, and the result thereof further reduced by the amount of thirty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($37,500,000).

(IV) The applicable adjustment factor shall be that ratio that results from dividing the amount derived in subclause (III) by the amount derived in subclause (I).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5). Except, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment
 adjustment amount exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation, and, where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall be reallocated to all other nonpublic hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata basis so that the aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts for all nonpublic hospitals equals the amount derived in subclause (III) of clause (i).

(D) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a public hospital as of July 1, 1998, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “public hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be derived as follows:

(I) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts
 determined under paragraph (3) for each public hospital described above shall be added together.

(II) The amount identified in paragraph (2) shall be reduced by the sum of the amounts determined for all nonpublic-converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A), the amounts determined for all converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) and the amounts determined for all nonpublic hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (C).

(III) The applicable adjustment factor shall be that ratio that results from dividing the amount derived in subclause (II) by the amount derived in subclause (I).

(ii) The product determined for each hospital under clause (i) shall be further adjusted as follows:

(I) The product shall be reduced as
 necessary so as not to exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation.

(II) With respect to a public hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, is part of a county-operated health system of three or more eligible hospitals licensed to the county, the product shall, prior to the application of subclause (I), be reduced by an amount equal to the amount paid or payable to the hospital under subdivision (af).

(III) Any amounts that would otherwise have been allocated to a hospital but for the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation as applied under subclause (I) shall be reallocated to all other public hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata basis. With respect to a public hospital described in subclause (II), the hospital’s pro rata share of any reallocated amounts shall be based on the product derived for the hospital under clause (i).

(IV) The amount determined for each hospital pursuant to subclause (I) and subclause (II), as applicable (including the reduction under subclause (II)), plus any reallocations to the hospital under subclause (III), shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5).

(5) The final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for each eligible hospital for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year shall be distributed as set forth below.

(A) With respect to the period July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, payment adjustment amounts shall be payable only to those eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1998, were not part of a county-operated health system of three
 or more eligible hospitals licensed to the county.

(i) The maximum amount of payment adjustments payable to eligible hospitals under this paragraph for the period of July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, shall be determined as follows:

(I) The maximum state disproportionate share hospitals allotment for California under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules shall be identified for the 1998 federal fiscal year. This maximum allotment is two billion one hundred seventeen million eight hundred ninety-nine thousand six hundred sixty-eight dollars ($2,117,899,668).

(II) The total amount of all payment adjustments under this section (exclusive of any payments under this subparagraph) applicable to the 1998 federal fiscal year, whether paid or payable, shall be determined. The applicability of payment
 adjustment amounts to the 1998 federal fiscal year shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(III) The figure determined under subclause (II) shall be subtracted from the figure identified under subclause (I). The positive remainder shall be the maximum amount of payment adjustments payable with respect to the period July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, under this subparagraph.

(ii) With respect to an eligible hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, meets the definition of a nonpublic-converted hospital, the maximum amount payable for the period July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, shall be equal to the product of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for the hospital pursuant to paragraph (4), multiplied by a fraction that is
 computed as follows:

(I) The maximum amount derived in subclause (III) of clause (i) shall be increased by an amount equal to the total amount of payment adjustments paid or payable under subdivision (af).

(II) The figure derived in subclause (I) shall be divided by the amount specified in paragraph (2).

(iii) With respect to an eligible hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, meets the definition of a converted hospital, the maximum amount payable for the period July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, shall be equal to the product of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for the hospital pursuant to paragraph (4), multiplied by a fraction that is computed as follows:

(I) The maximum amount derived in subclause (III) of
 clause (i) shall be increased by an amount equal to the total amount of payment adjustments paid or payable under subdivision (af).

(II) The figure derived in subclause (I) shall be divided by the amount specified in paragraph (2).

(iv) With respect to an eligible hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, meets the definition of a nonpublic hospital, the maximum amount payable for the period July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, shall be equal to the product of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for the hospital pursuant to paragraph (4), multiplied by a fraction that is computed as follows:

(I) The maximum amount derived in subclause (III) of clause (i) shall be increased by an amount equal to the total amount of payment adjustments paid or payable under subdivision (af).

(II) The figure derived in subclause (I) shall be divided by the amount specified in paragraph (2).

(v) With respect to an eligible hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, meets the definition of a public hospital, the maximum amount payable for the period July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, shall be equal to the product of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for the hospital pursuant to paragraph (4), multiplied by a fraction that is computed as follows:

(I) The maximum amount derived in subclause (III) of clause (i) shall be reduced by the sum of the amounts determined for all nonpublic-converted hospitals under clause (ii), the amounts determined for all converted hospitals under clause (iii) and the amounts determined for all nonpublic hospitals under clause (iv).

(II) The amounts computed under paragraph (4) with respect to all public hospitals that are subject to this subparagraph (A) shall be added together, yielding an aggregate sum.

(III) The figure derived in subclause (I) shall be divided by the aggregate sum derived in subclause (II).

(vi) The resulting product determined for each hospital pursuant to clauses (ii) through (v), as applicable, shall be distributed to the hospital in three equal installments, each payable as of the last day of each month from July 1998 through September 1998. However, no hospital shall receive an installment for any month in which the hospital does not remain in operation for the entire month. To the extent that any hospital is not entitled to receive an installment that otherwise would be payable but for the hospital’s failure to remain in
 operation through the last day of a particular month, the amount that would have been paid to the hospital shall be redistributed among those hospitals within the same hospital group (as those groups are described in clauses (ii) through (v)) that remain in operation from July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, to be distributed on a pro rata basis. The redistributed amounts shall be payable as of September 30, 1998.

(B) (i) With respect to the period October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999, payment adjustment amounts shall be payable to each eligible hospital in the amount equal to the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for the hospital pursuant to paragraph (4), less any payment adjustments paid or payable to the hospital, or payment adjustments that would have been payable but for the hospital’s failure to remain in operation for a particular month, under subparagraph (A). The payment
 adjustments shall be distributed in eight equal amounts, each payable as of the last day of each month from October 1998 through May 1999. However, no hospital shall receive an installment for any month in which the hospital does not remain in operation for the entire month.

(ii) To the extent that any hospital of either of the hospital types described in clause (iv) or (v) of subparagraph (A) is not entitled to receive an installment that otherwise would be payable but for the hospital’s failure to remain in operation through the last day of a particular month, the amount that would have been paid to the hospital shall be redistributed among those hospitals of the same hospital type that remain in operation from October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999, to be distributed on a pro rata basis. The redistributed amounts shall be payable as of June 30, 1999.

(iii) With respect to a
 public hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, is part of a county-operated health system of three or more eligible hospitals licensed to the county, the hospital’s pro rata share of any reallocations under clause (ii) shall be based on the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for the hospital pursuant to paragraph (4), as increased by an amount equal to the amount paid or payable to the hospital under subdivision (af).

(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year, no eligible hospital shall receive total payment adjustments in excess of the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation as computed by the department pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(7) The aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts computed under paragraph (4) for each eligible hospital shall be the maximum size
 of the payment adjustment program for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year, exclusive of the supplemental payment adjustments provided for under subdivision (ah).

(8) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(ah) (1) For the 1998–99 payment adjustment year, eligible hospitals that meet the requirements of this subdivision and that are in operation as of June 30, 1999, shall be eligible to receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the facility being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date, but only if the hospital has remained in operation for the period October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999.

(2) The availability of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision shall be determined as follows:

(A) The maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules shall be identified for the 1999 federal fiscal year. It is estimated that this amount will be two billion seventy-one million seven hundred seventy-four thousand nine hundred seventy-six dollars ($2,071,774,976).

(B) The total amount of all payment adjustment amounts under this section (exclusive of any payments under this subdivision) applicable to the 1999 federal fiscal year, whether paid or payable, shall be determined. The applicability of payment adjustment amounts to the 1999 federal fiscal year shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules,
 including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) The figure determined under subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the figure identified under subparagraph (A). If the remainder is a positive figure, supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments shall be made under this subdivision in accordance with paragraph (3). The positive remainder shall be the maximum amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision.

(3) (A) For purposes of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision, only hospitals that can be categorized into either of the two groups specified in clauses (i) and (ii) below shall be eligible to receive the supplemental payment adjustments, and no hospital may qualify for more than one of the two groups. The following groups of hospitals shall be
 recognized:

(i) “Public hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1998, met the definition of a public hospital.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1998, met the definition of a nonpublic hospital.

(B) The amount determined to be the maximum amount of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) shall first be allocated between the two groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraph (A) as follows:

(i) “Public hospitals”: 72.78 percent of the maximum amount.

(ii) “Nonpublic hospitals”: 27.22 percent of the maximum amount.

(C) The amount of funds allocated pursuant to subparagraph (B) to each of the particular groups of hospitals referred to in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall then be distributed as supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments among the eligible hospitals within each particular group as follows:

(i) The department shall identify for each eligible hospital the total amount of payment adjustments under this section (exclusive of any payments under this subdivision) applicable to the 1998–99 payment adjustment year, whether paid or payable. The applicability of the payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ii) The amount identified for each hospital under clause (i)
 shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital for the 1998–99 payment adjustment year.

(iii) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is equal to or exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the hospital shall not receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment. Data regarding hospitals that have reached this limitation shall not be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii).

(iv) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is less than the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under clause (i) shall be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (viii). Except, however, with respect to a public hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, was part
 of a county-operated health system of three or more eligible hospitals licensed to the county, the amount computed under clause (i) plus the amounts paid or payable to the hospital pursuant to subdivision (af) shall be used for purposes of clauses (v) through (vii), while the amount computed under clause (i) only shall be used for purposes of applying the limitation described in clause (viii).

(v) The figures determined under clause (iv) for each hospital in the particular group shall be added together to determine an aggregate total for each group.

(vi) The figures determined for each hospital under clause (iv) shall be divided by the aggregate total determined under clause (v) for the particular group, yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(vii) The percentage figure determined for each hospital under
 clause (vi) shall be applied to the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the particular group under subparagraph (B), to determine the hospital’s pro rata share of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments. Except, however, in the case of a nonpublic hospital that, as of July 1, 1998, met the definition of a children’s hospital, the pro rata share otherwise determined shall be multiplied by a factor of 1.09, yielding a modified pro rata share. The pro rata share for the other nonpublic hospitals shall be reduced accordingly, yielding a modified pro rata share, so that the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the nonpublic hospitals group will not be exceeded. The pro rata share or modified pro rata share, as applicable, for each hospital, as computed under this clause, shall also be used for all purposes relating to descending pro rata distributions under clause (viii).

(viii) In no event shall a hospital receive supplemental
 lump-sum payment adjustment amounts in excess of the difference between the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital and the amount computed for the hospital under clause (i). Any supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount, or portion thereof, that otherwise would have been payable under this paragraph to a hospital, but that is barred by this limitation, shall be distributed on a descending pro rata basis to those hospitals within the same group.

(D) The department shall make interim and final payments of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments to hospitals on or before August 15, 1999.

(4) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available.

(ai) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment adjustment amounts shall be payable in connection with the period of July 1 through September 30 of the 1999–2000 payment adjustment year. The payment adjustment program with respect to the period October 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000, shall be structured as set forth below and in subdivision (aj).

(1) (A) The department shall compute the projected total payment adjustment amounts for all eligible hospitals for the 1999–2000 payment adjustment year, by determining for each eligible hospital its total per diem composite amount and multiplying that figure by the maximum number of the hospital’s Medi-Cal inpatient paid days determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (l). For purposes of this subparagraph, these determinations shall be without regard to the OBRA 1993 payment limitations.

(B) The computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for each hospital shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital.

(C) Where the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under subparagraph (A) shall be reduced to an amount equal to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the particular hospital. The amount so reduced shall be used for purposes of subparagraph (E).

(D) Where the computed amount referred to in subparagraph (A) for the particular hospital is equal to or less than the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the computed amount referred to in
 subparagraph (A) shall be used for purposes of subparagraph (E).

(E) The amounts determined under subparagraphs (C) and (D) for all eligible hospitals shall be added together, yielding an aggregate sum. The aggregate sum shall be the unadjusted projected total payment adjustment program for the period of October 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000, exclusive of any supplemental payment adjustments under subdivision (aj).

(2) The initial maximum size of the payment adjustment program for the period October 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000, shall be set at one billion seven hundred fifty million dollars ($1,750,000,000), exclusive of any supplemental payment adjustments under subdivision (aj).

(3) The department shall increase or decrease the amount determined for each eligible hospital under subparagraph (C) or (D) of
 paragraph (1), as applicable, by multiplying the amount by an identical percentage, yielding the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the period October 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000. The identical percentage figure to be used for this purpose shall be that percentage that is derived by dividing the amount set forth in paragraph (2) by the aggregate sum determined under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1). Except, however, the amount determined for a hospital under subparagraphs (C) or (D) of paragraph (1) shall not be increased so that it would exceed the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, and, where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall be reallocated to all other hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata basis so that the aggregate sum of the tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for all hospitals equals the amount set
 forth in paragraph (2).

(4) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount computed for each eligible hospital under paragraph (3) shall be further adjusted as follows:

(A) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a nonpublic-converted hospital as of July 1, 1999, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “nonpublic-converted hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be that which is necessary to result in an amount for each such hospital equal to the amount used for the particular hospital under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1, 1999,
 through June 30, 2000, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5).

(B) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a converted hospital as of July 1, 1999, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “converted hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be that which is necessary to result for each such hospital in an amount equal to: (I) the maximum number of the hospital’s annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (l); multiplied by (II) the total per diem composite amount determined for the hospital, the calculation of the per diem composite amount being restricted by a maximum low-income number of 40 percent for the hospital, regardless if the hospital’s low-income number would otherwise be higher. In no case shall the product of this calculation
 exceed the amount used for the particular hospital under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5).

(C) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a nonpublic hospital as of July 1, 1999, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “nonpublic hospital adjustment factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be derived as follows:

(I) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts determined under paragraph (3) for each nonpublic hospital shall be added together.

(II) The amount identified in paragraph (2) shall be divided by 2.130. The resulting figure shall then be reduced by the sums of the amounts determined for all nonpublic-converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) and all converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (B).

(III) The amount computed under subclause (II) shall be divided by 2, and the result thereof further reduced by the amount of thirty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($37,500,000).

(IV) The applicable adjustment factor shall be that ratio that results from dividing the amount derived in subclause (III) by the amount derived in subclause (I).

(ii) The resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital
 for the period October 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5). Except, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation, and, where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall be reallocated to all other nonpublic hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata basis so that the aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts for all nonpublic hospitals equals the amount derived in subclause (III) of clause (i).

(D) (i) For each eligible hospital that meets the definition of a public hospital as of July 1, 1999, the hospital’s tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount shall be multiplied by a “public hospital adjustment
 factor.” The applicable adjustment factor shall be derived as follows:

(I) The tentative adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts determined under paragraph (3) for each public hospital described above shall be added together.

(II) The amount identified in paragraph (2) shall be reduced by the sums of the amounts determined for all nonpublic-converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) and all converted hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (B), and the sum of the amounts determined for all nonpublic hospitals under clause (ii) of subparagraph (C).

(III) The applicable adjustment factor shall be that ratio that results from dividing the amount derived in subclause (II) by the amount derived in subclause (I).

(ii) The
 resulting product shall be the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the period October 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000, which shall be paid to the hospital in accordance with paragraph (5). Except, however, in no case shall the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount exceed the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation, and, where that would otherwise occur, the remaining amount that would have been allocated to the particular hospital shall be reallocated to all other public hospitals (that have not reached their OBRA 1993 payment limitation) on a pro rata basis so that the aggregate sum of the final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amounts for all public hospitals equals the amount derived in subclause (II) of clause (i).

(5) (A) The final adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount determined for each eligible hospital for the period October 1,
 1999, through June 30, 2000, shall be distributed to the hospital in 8 equal installments, each payable as of the last day of each month from October 1999 through May 2000. However, no hospital shall receive an installment for any month in which the hospital does not remain in operation for the entire month.

(B) To the extent that any hospital of either of the hospital types described in subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (4) is not entitled to receive an installment that otherwise would be payable but for the hospital’s failure to remain in operation through the last day of a particular month, the amount that would have been paid to the hospital shall be redistributed among those hospitals of the same hospital type that remain in operation from October 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000, to be distributed on a pro rata basis. The redistributed amounts shall be payable as of June 30, 2000.

(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, with respect to a hospital that meets the definition of a public hospital as of July 1, 1999, the provisions of paragraphs (1) through (5) shall initially be implemented for the period October 1, 1999, through December 31, 1999, without application of the OBRA 1993 payment limitations. As of January 1, 2000, the department shall recalculate all determinations under paragraphs (1) through (5) for the payment adjustment year, taking into account the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation as determined pursuant to federal medicaid law in existence as of January 1, 2000, and adjust, as necessary, the monthly payment installments from January 2000 through May 2000 to take into account any modifications to the recalculated amounts payable for the period October 1999 through December 1999 as may arise from the application of this paragraph.

(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the entire 1999–2000 payment adjustment year, no eligible hospital shall receive total payment adjustments in excess of the hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation as computed by the department pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan.
